resources/dicts/fr-classique+reforme1990.aff
FLAG long
SFX pS Y 167
SFX pS oir oir/53 oir 64
SFX pS sseoir sseyant/6 seoir 48
SFX pS ssoir sseyant/6 soir 48
SFX pS sseoir ssoyant/6 seoir 48
SFX pS ssoir ssoyant/6 soir 48
SFX pS sseoir ssis/28 seoir 121
SFX pS sseoir ssise/28 seoir 80
SFX pS sseoir ssises/28 seoir 81
SFX pS ssoir ssis/28 soir 121
SFX pS ssoir ssise/28 soir 80
SFX pS ssoir ssises/28 soir 81
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/23 seoir 34
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/20 seoir 35
SFX pS sseoir ssied/6 seoir 21
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/17 seoir 56
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/14 seoir 72
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/6 seoir 26
SFX pS sseoir ssois/23 seoir 34
SFX pS sseoir ssois/20 seoir 35
SFX pS sseoir ssoit/6 seoir 21
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/17 seoir 56
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/14 seoir 72
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/6 seoir 26
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/23 soir 34
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/20 soir 35
SFX pS ssoir ssied/6 soir 21
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/17 soir 56
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/14 soir 72
SFX pS ssoir sseyent/6 soir 26
SFX pS ssoir ssois/23 soir 34
SFX pS ssoir ssois/20 soir 35
SFX pS ssoir ssoit/6 soir 21
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/17 soir 56
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/14 soir 72
SFX pS ssoir ssoient/6 soir 26
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/23 seoir 66
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/20 seoir 65
SFX pS sseoir sseyait/6 seoir 50
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/17 seoir 77
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/14 seoir 76
SFX pS sseoir sseyaient/6 seoir 51
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/23 seoir 66
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/20 seoir 65
SFX pS sseoir ssoyait/6 seoir 50
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/17 seoir 77
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/14 seoir 76
SFX pS sseoir ssoyaient/6 seoir 51
SFX pS ssoir sseyais/23 soir 66
SFX pS ssoir sseyais/20 soir 65
SFX pS ssoir sseyait/6 soir 50
SFX pS ssoir sseyions/17 soir 77
SFX pS ssoir sseyiez/14 soir 76
SFX pS ssoir sseyaient/6 soir 51
SFX pS ssoir ssoyais/23 soir 66
SFX pS ssoir ssoyais/20 soir 65
SFX pS ssoir ssoyait/6 soir 50
SFX pS ssoir ssoyions/17 soir 77
SFX pS ssoir ssoyiez/14 soir 76
SFX pS ssoir ssoyaient/6 soir 51
SFX pS sseoir ssis/23 seoir 69
SFX pS sseoir ssis/20 seoir 68
SFX pS sseoir ssit/6 seoir 53
SFX pS sseoir ssîmes/17 seoir 63
SFX pS sseoir ssîtes/14 seoir 62
SFX pS sseoir ssirent/6 seoir 71
SFX pS ssoir ssis/23 soir 69
SFX pS ssoir ssis/20 soir 68
SFX pS ssoir ssit/6 soir 53
SFX pS ssoir ssîmes/17 soir 63
SFX pS ssoir ssîtes/14 soir 62
SFX pS ssoir ssirent/6 soir 71
SFX pS sseoir ssiérai/23 seoir 38
SFX pS sseoir ssiéras/20 seoir 37
SFX pS sseoir ssiéra/6 seoir 22
SFX pS sseoir ssiérons/17 seoir 31
SFX pS sseoir ssiérez/14 seoir 30
SFX pS sseoir ssiéront/6 seoir 24
SFX pS sseoir ssoirai/23 seoir 38
SFX pS sseoir ssoiras/20 seoir 37
SFX pS sseoir ssoira/6 seoir 22
SFX pS sseoir ssoirons/17 seoir 31
SFX pS sseoir ssoirez/14 seoir 30
SFX pS sseoir ssoiront/6 seoir 24
SFX pS ssoir ssiérai/23 soir 38
SFX pS ssoir ssiéras/20 soir 37
SFX pS ssoir ssiéra/6 soir 22
SFX pS ssoir ssiérons/17 soir 31
SFX pS ssoir ssiérez/14 soir 30
SFX pS ssoir ssiéront/6 soir 24
SFX pS ssoir ssoirai/23 soir 38
SFX pS ssoir ssoiras/20 soir 37
SFX pS ssoir ssoira/6 soir 22
SFX pS ssoir ssoirons/17 soir 31
SFX pS ssoir ssoirez/14 soir 30
SFX pS ssoir ssoiront/6 soir 24
SFX pS sseoir ssiérais/23 seoir 40
SFX pS sseoir ssiérais/20 seoir 39
SFX pS sseoir ssiérait/6 seoir 23
SFX pS sseoir ssiérions/17 seoir 33
SFX pS sseoir ssiériez/14 seoir 32
SFX pS sseoir ssiéraient/6 seoir 25
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/23 seoir 40
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/20 seoir 39
SFX pS sseoir ssoirait/6 seoir 23
SFX pS sseoir ssoirions/17 seoir 33
SFX pS sseoir ssoiriez/14 seoir 32
SFX pS sseoir ssoiraient/6 seoir 25
SFX pS ssoir ssiérais/23 soir 40
SFX pS ssoir ssiérais/20 soir 39
SFX pS ssoir ssiérait/6 soir 23
SFX pS ssoir ssiérions/17 soir 33
SFX pS ssoir ssiériez/14 soir 32
SFX pS ssoir ssiéraient/6 soir 25
SFX pS ssoir ssoirais/23 soir 40
SFX pS ssoir ssoirais/20 soir 39
SFX pS ssoir ssoirait/6 soir 23
SFX pS ssoir ssoirions/17 soir 33
SFX pS ssoir ssoiriez/14 soir 32
SFX pS ssoir ssoiraient/6 soir 25
SFX pS sseoir sseye/44 seoir 41
SFX pS sseoir sseyes/36 seoir 44
SFX pS sseoir sseye/6 seoir 27
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/56 seoir 74
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/31 seoir 73
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/6 seoir 28
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/44 seoir 41
SFX pS sseoir ssoies/36 seoir 44
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/6 seoir 27
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/56 seoir 74
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/31 seoir 73
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/6 seoir 28
SFX pS ssoir sseye/44 soir 41
SFX pS ssoir sseyes/36 soir 44
SFX pS ssoir sseye/6 soir 27
SFX pS ssoir sseyions/56 soir 74
SFX pS ssoir sseyiez/31 soir 73
SFX pS ssoir sseyent/6 soir 28
SFX pS ssoir ssoie/44 soir 41
SFX pS ssoir ssoies/36 soir 44
SFX pS ssoir ssoie/6 soir 27
SFX pS ssoir ssoyions/56 soir 74
SFX pS ssoir ssoyiez/31 soir 73
SFX pS ssoir ssoient/6 soir 28
SFX pS sseoir ssisse/23 seoir 61
SFX pS sseoir ssisses/20 seoir 67
SFX pS sseoir ssît/6 seoir 52
SFX pS sseoir ssissions/17 seoir 60
SFX pS sseoir ssissiez/14 seoir 59
SFX pS sseoir ssissent/6 seoir 54
SFX pS ssoir ssisse/23 soir 61
SFX pS ssoir ssisses/20 soir 67
SFX pS ssoir ssît/6 soir 52
SFX pS ssoir ssissions/17 soir 60
SFX pS ssoir ssissiez/14 soir 59
SFX pS ssoir ssissent/6 soir 54
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/36 seoir 36
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/45 seoir 58
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/31 seoir 75
SFX pS sseoir ssois/36 seoir 36
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/45 seoir 58
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/31 seoir 75
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/36 soir 36
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/45 soir 58
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/31 soir 75
SFX pS ssoir ssois/36 soir 36
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/45 soir 58
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/31 soir 75

SFX pT N 99
SFX pT oir oir oir 64
SFX pT urseoir ursoyant seoir 48
SFX pT ursoir ursoyant soir 48
SFX pT urseoir ursis seoir 121
SFX pT urseoir ursise seoir 80
SFX pT urseoir ursises seoir 81
SFX pT ursoir ursis soir 121
SFX pT ursoir ursise soir 80
SFX pT ursoir ursises soir 81
SFX pT urseoir ursois seoir 34
SFX pT urseoir ursois seoir 35
SFX pT urseoir ursoit seoir 21
SFX pT urseoir ursoyons seoir 56
SFX pT urseoir ursoyez seoir 72
SFX pT urseoir ursoient seoir 26
SFX pT ursoir ursois soir 34
SFX pT ursoir ursois soir 35
SFX pT ursoir ursoit soir 21
SFX pT ursoir ursoyons soir 56
SFX pT ursoir ursoyez soir 72
SFX pT ursoir ursoient soir 26
SFX pT urseoir ursoyais seoir 66
SFX pT urseoir ursoyais seoir 65
SFX pT urseoir ursoyait seoir 50
SFX pT urseoir ursoyions seoir 77
SFX pT urseoir ursoyiez seoir 76
SFX pT urseoir ursoyaient seoir 51
SFX pT ursoir ursoyais soir 66
SFX pT ursoir ursoyais soir 65
SFX pT ursoir ursoyait soir 50
SFX pT ursoir ursoyions soir 77
SFX pT ursoir ursoyiez soir 76
SFX pT ursoir ursoyaient soir 51
SFX pT urseoir ursis seoir 69
SFX pT urseoir ursis seoir 68
SFX pT urseoir ursit seoir 53
SFX pT urseoir ursîmes seoir 63
SFX pT urseoir ursîtes seoir 62
SFX pT urseoir ursirent seoir 71
SFX pT ursoir ursis soir 69
SFX pT ursoir ursis soir 68
SFX pT ursoir ursit soir 53
SFX pT ursoir ursîmes soir 63
SFX pT ursoir ursîtes soir 62
SFX pT ursoir ursirent soir 71
SFX pT urseoir urseoirai seoir 38
SFX pT urseoir urseoiras seoir 37
SFX pT urseoir urseoira seoir 22
SFX pT urseoir urseoirons seoir 31
SFX pT urseoir urseoirez seoir 30
SFX pT urseoir urseoiront seoir 24
SFX pT ursoir ursoirai soir 38
SFX pT ursoir ursoiras soir 37
SFX pT ursoir ursoira soir 22
SFX pT ursoir ursoirons soir 31
SFX pT ursoir ursoirez soir 30
SFX pT ursoir ursoiront soir 24
SFX pT urseoir urseoirais seoir 40
SFX pT urseoir urseoirais seoir 39
SFX pT urseoir urseoirait seoir 23
SFX pT urseoir urseoirions seoir 33
SFX pT urseoir urseoiriez seoir 32
SFX pT urseoir urseoiraient seoir 25
SFX pT ursoir ursoirais soir 40
SFX pT ursoir ursoirais soir 39
SFX pT ursoir ursoirait soir 23
SFX pT ursoir ursoirions soir 33
SFX pT ursoir ursoiriez soir 32
SFX pT ursoir ursoiraient soir 25
SFX pT urseoir ursoie seoir 41
SFX pT urseoir ursoies seoir 44
SFX pT urseoir ursoie seoir 27
SFX pT urseoir ursoyions seoir 74
SFX pT urseoir ursoyiez seoir 73
SFX pT urseoir ursoient seoir 28
SFX pT ursoir ursoie soir 41
SFX pT ursoir ursoies soir 44
SFX pT ursoir ursoie soir 27
SFX pT ursoir ursoyions soir 74
SFX pT ursoir ursoyiez soir 73
SFX pT ursoir ursoient soir 28
SFX pT urseoir ursisse seoir 61
SFX pT urseoir ursisses seoir 67
SFX pT urseoir ursît seoir 52
SFX pT urseoir ursissions seoir 60
SFX pT urseoir ursissiez seoir 59
SFX pT urseoir ursissent seoir 54
SFX pT ursoir ursisse soir 61
SFX pT ursoir ursisses soir 67
SFX pT ursoir ursît soir 52
SFX pT ursoir ursissions soir 60
SFX pT ursoir ursissiez soir 59
SFX pT ursoir ursissent soir 54
SFX pT urseoir ursois seoir 36
SFX pT urseoir ursoyons seoir 58
SFX pT urseoir ursoyez seoir 75
SFX pT ursoir ursois soir 36
SFX pT ursoir ursoyons soir 58
SFX pT ursoir ursoyez soir 75

SFX pU N 5
SFX pU eoir eoir seoir 64
SFX pU eoir éant seoir 48
SFX pU eoir is seoir 121
SFX pU eoir ise seoir 80
SFX pU eoir ises seoir 81

SFX pV N 14
SFX pV eoir eoir seoir 64
SFX pV eoir éant seoir 48
SFX pV eoir eyant seoir 48
SFX pV eoir is seoir 106
SFX pV eoir ied seoir 21
SFX pV eoir iéent seoir 26
SFX pV eoir eyait seoir 50
SFX pV eoir eyaient seoir 51
SFX pV eoir iéra seoir 22
SFX pV eoir iéront seoir 24
SFX pV eoir iérait seoir 23
SFX pV eoir iéraient seoir 25
SFX pV eoir iée seoir 27
SFX pV eoir iéent seoir 28

SFX pW N 23
SFX pW oir oir oir 64
SFX pW sseoir sséant seoir 48
SFX pW ssoir sséant soir 48
SFX pW sseoir ssied seoir 21
SFX pW sseoir ssiéent seoir 26
SFX pW ssoir ssied soir 21
SFX pW ssoir ssiéent soir 26
SFX pW sseoir sseyait seoir 50
SFX pW sseoir sseyaient seoir 51
SFX pW ssoir sseyait soir 50
SFX pW ssoir sseyaient soir 51
SFX pW sseoir ssiéra seoir 22
SFX pW sseoir ssiéront seoir 24
SFX pW ssoir ssiéra soir 22
SFX pW ssoir ssiéront soir 24
SFX pW sseoir ssiérait seoir 23
SFX pW sseoir ssiéraient seoir 25
SFX pW ssoir ssiérait soir 23
SFX pW ssoir ssiéraient soir 25
SFX pW sseoir ssiée seoir 27
SFX pW sseoir ssiéent seoir 28
SFX pW ssoir ssiée soir 27
SFX pW ssoir ssiéent soir 28

SFX pX N 62
SFX pX hoir hoir choir 64
SFX pX hoir hu choir 85
SFX pX hoir hus choir 86
SFX pX hoir hue choir 80
SFX pX hoir hues choir 81
SFX pX hoir hois choir 34
SFX pX hoir hois choir 35
SFX pX hoir hoit choir 21
SFX pX hoir hoyons choir 56
SFX pX hoir hoyez choir 72
SFX pX hoir hoient choir 26
SFX pX hoir hoyais déchoir 66
SFX pX hoir hoyais déchoir 65
SFX pX hoir hoyait déchoir 50
SFX pX hoir hoyions déchoir 77
SFX pX hoir hoyiez déchoir 76
SFX pX hoir hoyaient déchoir 51
SFX pX hoir hus choir 69
SFX pX hoir hus choir 68
SFX pX hoir hut choir 53
SFX pX hoir hûmes choir 63
SFX pX hoir hûtes choir 62
SFX pX hoir hurent choir 71
SFX pX hoir hoirai choir 38
SFX pX hoir herrai choir 38
SFX pX hoir hoiras choir 37
SFX pX hoir herras choir 37
SFX pX hoir hoira choir 22
SFX pX hoir herra choir 22
SFX pX hoir hoirons choir 31
SFX pX hoir herrons choir 31
SFX pX hoir hoirez choir 30
SFX pX hoir herrez choir 30
SFX pX hoir hoiront choir 24
SFX pX hoir herront choir 24
SFX pX hoir hoirais choir 40
SFX pX hoir herrais choir 40
SFX pX hoir hoirais choir 39
SFX pX hoir herrais choir 39
SFX pX hoir hoirait choir 23
SFX pX hoir herrait choir 23
SFX pX hoir hoirions choir 33
SFX pX hoir herrions choir 33
SFX pX hoir hoiriez choir 32
SFX pX hoir herriez choir 32
SFX pX hoir hoiraient choir 25
SFX pX hoir herraient choir 25
SFX pX hoir hoie choir 41
SFX pX hoir hoies choir 44
SFX pX hoir hoie choir 27
SFX pX hoir hoyions choir 74
SFX pX hoir hoyiez choir 73
SFX pX hoir hoient choir 28
SFX pX hoir husse choir 61
SFX pX hoir husses choir 67
SFX pX hoir hût choir 52
SFX pX hoir hussions choir 60
SFX pX hoir hussiez choir 59
SFX pX hoir hussent choir 54
SFX pX hoir hois déchoir 36
SFX pX hoir hoyons déchoir 58
SFX pX hoir hoyez déchoir 75
